Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.165.015

Definitions.

Unless the context clearly indicates otherwise the definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter.

(1) "Basic skills areas" means reading, writing, and mathematics as well as readiness associated with these skills.

(2) "Statewide student assessments" means one or more of the assessments administered by school districts as required under RCW 28A.655.070.

(3) "Students who are not meeting academic standards" means students with the greatest academic deficits in basic skills as identified by statewide, school, or district assessments or other performance measurement tools.

[ 2021 c 111 s 6; 2017 3rd sp.s. c 13 s 404; 2013 2nd sp.s. c 18 s 202; 2009 c 548 s 702; 2004 c 20 s 2.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—Effective date—2021 c 111: See notes following RCW 28A.300.139.

Effective date—2017 3rd sp.s. c 13 ss 401-413: See note following RCW 28A.150.200.

Intent—2017 3rd sp.s. c 13: See note following RCW 28A.150.410.

Application—Enforcement of laws protecting health and safety—2013 2nd sp.s. c 18: See note following RCW 28A.600.022.

Effective date—2009 c 548 ss 101-110 and 701-710: See note following RCW 28A.150.200.

Intent—2009 c 548: See RCW 28A.150.1981.

Finding—2009 c 548: See note following RCW 28A.410.270.

Intent—Finding—2009 c 548: See note following RCW 28A.305.130.